Washington statutes.
RCW 43.31.583

Early learning facilities grant and loan program—Report.

When funding is provided in the previous biennium, the department, in collaboration with the department of children, youth, and families, shall submit a report no later than December 1st of even-numbered years, to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature that provides an update on the status of the early learning facilities grant and loan program that includes, but is not limited to:

(1) The total amount of funds, by grant and loan, spent or contracted to be spent; and

(2) A list of projects awarded funding including, but not limited to, information about whether the project is a renovation or new construction or some other category, where the project is located, and the number of slots the project supports.

[ 2018 c 58 s 16; 2017 3rd sp.s. c 12 s 11.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2018 c 58: See note following RCW 28A.655.080.

Findings—Intent—Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 12: See notes following RCW 43.31.565.